District of Columbia statutes.
37-113

Reporting requirements.

No later than January 2, 2004, the CPMO shall file a report with the Council for review. The report shall contain information including, but not limited to, a report on the operations and management of Eastern Market for the past 5 year period, financial operations, a summary of all contractual activities, and an assessment of management operations including EMCAC functions and procedures and a report on the Market’s capital status and needs.

Apr. 16, 1999, D.C. Law 12-228, § 14, 46 DCR 1066

History

1981 Ed., § 10-313.

Prior Codifications